District of Columbia statutes.
5-115.07

Gaming and bawdy houses and sale of lottery tickets — Prosecution of persons; destruction of seized articles; closing of premises.

It shall be the duty of the Chief of Police to cause all persons arrested in pursuance of the provisions of § 5-115.06 to be rigorously prosecuted, the articles seized to be destroyed, and such room or house to be closed, and not again used for such unlawful purpose.

R.S., D.C., § 403

History

Search warrants, disposition of property, see § 23-525.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 4-146.
1973 Ed., § 4-146.

Prior Codifications

Office of Major and Superintendent of Metropolitan Police abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 5-105.01.

Editor's Notes